Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.230

Moving another's livestock from range.

No person shall remove any livestock belonging to another from the range on which they are permitted to run at large, without the prior consent of the owner thereof. The owner of any livestock may move his or her own livestock, together with such other livestock as cannot be separated from his or her own, to the nearest corral, or other facility in order to separate his or her own livestock, if the other livestock are returned to the same location from which they were moved within twenty-four hours.

[ 1985 c 415 s 21; 1891 c 12 s 1; RRS s 3048. Formerly RCW 16.28.170, part. Formerly RCW 16.28.165.]